hr-HR: Lokacija komponente prozora: Prozor prednjih vrata; Prozor prtljažnika; Stražnji bočni prozor; Prozor stražnjih vrata; Stražnje vjetrobransko staklo / stražnje staklo; Prozor kliznih vrata; Krovni prozor / šiber; Ventilacijski prozor; Vjetrobransko staklo; Ostalo
lt-LT: Lango komponento vieta: Priekinių durų langas; Bagažinės dangčio langas; Kampinis langas; Galinių durų langas; Galinis stiklas; Slankiųjų durų langas; Stoglangis; Vėdinimo langelis; Priekinis stiklas; Kita
ru: Расположение оконного элемента: Окно передней двери; Стекло двери багажника; Глухое боковое стекло; Окно задней двери; Заднее стекло; Окно сдвижной двери; Люк / панорамная крыша; Вентиляционное окно (форточка); Лобовое стекло; Другое
sl-SI: Lokacija komponente okna: Okno sprednjih vrat; Okno prtljažnih vrat; Stransko okno; Okno zadnjih vrat; Zadnje vetrobransko steklo / zadnje steklo; Okno drsnih vrat; Strešno okno; Prezračevalno okno; Vetrobransko steklo; Drugo
de: Position der Fensterkomponente: Vordertürfenster; Heckklappenfenster; Dreiecksfenster; Hintertürfenster; Heckscheibe; Schiebetürfenster; Schiebedach / Panoramadach; Ausstellfenster; Windschutzscheibe; Sonstige
es: Ubicación de los componentes de la ventana: Ventana de la puerta delantera; Ventana de compuerta trasera / portón; Ventana de aleta; Ventana de la puerta trasera; Parabrisas trasero / cristal trasero; Ventana de la puerta corrediza; Quemacocos / techo corredizo; Ventana de ventilación; Parabrisas; Otro
sv: Fönsterkomponentens placering: Framdörrsfönster; Bakluckefönster; Sidoruta (kvartsruta); Bakdörrsfönster; Bakruta; Skjutdörrsfönster; Taklucka / panoramatak; Ventilationsfönster; Vindruta; Övrigt
pt-PT: Localização do componente do vidro: Janela da porta dianteira; Janela do portão traseiro / bagageira; Janela de custódia; Janela da porta traseira; Para-brisas traseiro / óculo traseiro; Janela da porta de correr; Teto de abrir / teto panorâmico; Janela de ventilação; Para-brisas; Outro
ja: ウィンドウコンポーネントロケーション: フロントドアウィンドウ; ハッチ / リフトゲートウィンドウ; クォーターウィンドウ; リアドアウィンドウ; リアウィンドシールド / バックガラス; スライドドアウィンドウ; サンルーフ / ムーンルーフ; ベントウィンドウ; ウィンドシールド; その他
ro-RO: Locația componentei geamului: Geam ușă față; Geam hayon / ușă portbagaj; Geam de custodie; Geam ușă spate; Parbriz spate / lunetă; Geam ușă glisantă; Trapă / plafon panoramic; Geam de ventilație; Parbriz; Altele
fr: Emplacement du composant de vitrage: Vitre de porte avant; Vitre de hayon; Vitre de custode; Vitre de porte arrière; Pare-brise arrière / lunette arrière; Vitre de porte coulissante; Toit ouvrant / toit panoramique; Déflecteur; Pare-brise; Autre
bg-BG: Разположение на компонент на прозореца: Прозорец на предна врата; Прозорец на задна врата / багажник; Ъглов прозорец; Прозорец на задна врата; Задно стъкло; Прозорец на плъзгаща се врата; Люк / панорамен покрив; Вентилационен прозорец; Предно стъкло; Друго
en: Window component location: Front door window; Hatch / liftgate window; Quarter window; Rear door window; Rear windshield / back glass; Sliding door window; Sunroof / moonroof; Vent window; Windshield; Other
da: Placering af vindueskomponent: Fordørsrude; Rude i bagklap; Trekantrude; Bagdørsrude; Bagrude; Rude i skydedør; Soltag / panoramatag; Ventilationsrude; Forrude; Andet
el: Τοποθεσία στοιχείου παραθύρου: Παράθυρο μπροστινής πόρτας; Παράθυρο πορτμπαγκάζ / πίσω πόρτας; Πίσω πλαϊνό τζάμι; Παράθυρο πίσω πόρτας; Πίσω παρμπρίζ / πίσω τζάμι; Παράθυρο συρόμενης πόρτας; Ηλιοροφή; Παράθυρο εξαερισμού; Παρμπρίζ; Άλλο
it: Posizione del componente del finestrino: Finestrino porta anteriore; Finestrino portellone / lunotto; Deflettore posteriore; Finestrino porta posteriore; Lunotto posteriore; Finestrino porta scorrevole; Tetto apribile / panoramico; Deflettore apribile; Parabrezza; Altro
nl: Raam onderdeel locatie: Raam voordeur; Achterklepraam; Achterzijruit; Raam achterdeur; Achterruit; Raam schuifdeur; Schuif-/kanteldak; Ventilatieraam; Voorruit; Overige
fi: Ikkunakomponenttien sijainti: Etuoven ikkuna; Takaluukun ikkuna; Pieni sivulasi; Takaoven ikkuna; Takalasi; Liukuoven ikkuna; Kattoluukku / lasikatto; Tuuletusikkuna; Tuulilasi; Muu
pt-BR: Janela localização do componente: Vidro da porta dianteira; Vidro da tampa do porta-malas; Vidro vigia; Vidro da porta traseira; Para-brisa traseiro / vidro traseiro; Vidro da porta deslizante; Teto solar; Vidro quebra-vento; Para-brisa; Outro
sk-SK: Lokalita komponentov okna: Okno predných dverí; Okno zadných vyklápacích dverí; Trojuholníkové okno; Okno zadných dverí; Zadné sklo; Okno posuvných dverí; Strešné okno; Vetracie okienko; Čelné sklo; Iné
zh-TW: 車窗組件位置: 前車門車窗; 掀背門 / 尾門車窗; 三角窗; 後車門車窗; 後擋風玻璃 / 後車窗; 滑門車窗; 天窗; 側角窗 / 通風窗; 擋風玻璃; 其他
hu: Ablakalkatrész elhelyezkedése: Első ajtó ablak; Csomagtérajtó- / Felnyílóajtó-ablak; Pillangóablak; Hátsó ajtó ablak; Hátsó szélvédő / Hátsó üveg; Tolóajtó-ablak; Napfénytető / Panorámatető; Szellőzőablak; Szélvédő; Egyéb
nb: Plassering av vinduskomponent: Fordørsvindu; Kombiluke/baklukevindu; Siderute bak; Bakdørsvindu; Bakrute; Skyvedørsvindu; Soltak / glasstak; Luftevindu; Frontrute; Annet
cs: Umístění součásti okna: Okno předních dveří; Okno zadních výklopných dveří; Boční okénko; Okno zadních dveří; Zadní sklo; Okno posuvných dveří; Střešní okno; Větrací okénko; Čelní sklo; Jiné
th: ส่วนประกอบหน้าต่างโซล: หน้าต่างประตูหน้า; หน้าต่างประตูท้ายรถ; กระจกหูช้าง; หน้าต่างประตูหลัง; กระจกบังลมหลัง / กระจกหลัง; หน้าต่างประตูบานเลื่อน; ซันรูฟ / มูนรูฟ; หน้าต่างระบายอากาศ; กระจกบังลม; อื่นๆ
tr: Pencere bileşeni konumu: Ön kapı camı; Bagaj kapağı camı; Kelebek camı; Arka kapı camı; Arka cam; Sürgülü kapı camı; Sunroof / moonroof; Havalandırma camı; Ön cam; Diğer
ko: 창 부품 위치: 프런트 도어 창문; 해치 / 리프트게이트 창문; 쿼터 창문; 리어 도어 창문; 후면 윈드실드 / 뒷유리; 슬라이딩 도어 창문; 선루프 / 문루프; 벤트 창문; 윈드실드; 기타
pl: Położenie komponentu szyby: Szyba przednich drzwi; Szyba klapy tylnej; Szyba boczna karoseryjna; Szyba tylnych drzwi; Tylna szyba; Szyba drzwi przesuwnych; Szyberdach / dach panoramiczny; Szyba wentylacyjna (lufcik); Przednia szyba; Inne
zh-CN: 车窗组件位置: 前车门车窗; 掀背/尾门车窗; 侧角窗; 后车门车窗; 后挡风玻璃/后车窗; 滑动门车窗; 天窗; 通风窗; 挡风玻璃; 其他
vi: Địa điểm thành phần cửa sổ: Cửa sổ cửa trước; Cửa sổ cốp / đuôi xe; Cửa sổ góc; Cửa sổ cửa sau; Kính chắn gió sau / kính sau; Cửa sổ cửa lùa; Cửa sổ trời; Cửa sổ thông gió; Kính chắn gió; Khác